District of Columbia statutes.
2-1565.04

Staff.

(a)

One adult person shall be hired as a full-time youth planner, and youth may be hired to work part-time, as needed.

(b)

The Council shall provide staff assistance to the Youth Council from within its existing budgeted resources or from grants received by the Council for this purpose. Staff assigned by the Council to the Youth Council shall assist with the drafting of all legislation submitted to the Council by the Youth Council. Youth Council staff may be curtailed during periods when the Council is in regular or special session.

Oct. 22, 2008, D.C. Law 17-251, § 5, 55 DCR 9247